Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,222
Department of Justice; Claims Division; assistant attorney general; duties.

There is hereby established within the Department of Justice a Claims Division to be headed by an assistant attorney general appointed by and under the control of the Attorney General. The Attorney General may authorize the assistant attorney general in charge of the Claims Division to perform any of the duties imposed upon the Attorney General by the State Tort Claims Act and may employ other persons, firms, or corporations to investigate claims under the act.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 14, p. 2850;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 33.